Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA FOREST ZONE TRAPPERS ASSOCIATION.new text end new text begin $1,950,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for a grant to the Minnesota Forest Zone Trappers Association for land acquisition, predesign, design, engineering, site preparation, grading, finishing, and site features for a Sportsman's and Sportswoman's Outdoor Development Learning Center in the city of Hibbing. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end